New York, session 2025-2026, A3651.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 123 2 to read as follows: 3 § 123. Minimum rules for the treatment of incarcerated individuals. 1. 4 Subject to constitutional and federal law but notwithstanding any other 5 section of law, the United Nations standard minimum rules for the treat- 6 ment of prisoners, also known as the Nelson Mandela rules, are hereby 7 incorporated by reference into this chapter, including, but not limited 8 to: 9 (a) a prohibition against prolonged confinement of more than fifteen 10 days in segregated confinement, administrative segregation or any other 11 form of solitary confinement or social isolation; 12 (b) community standards for medical and dental care, and a duty for 13 medical professionals to report when they notice mistreatment or abuse 14 of an incarcerated individual; 15 (c) the right of incarcerated individuals to make confidential 16 complaints to superintendents and central office staff without fear of 17 retaliation or intimidation; 18 (d) the right to be placed whenever feasible in a correctional facili- 19 ty close to a person's home or to the community where such person 20 expects to be released; 21 (e) the right to in-person visits contingent upon the visitor's agree- 22 ment to be searched if necessary for security purposes; 23 (f) the right to effective legal aid; 24 (g) adequate and on-going training for staff; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02261-01-5 A. 3651 2 1 (h) oversight by an independent agency with right of entry into any 2 correctional institution at any time, full access to all records and the 3 ability to interview both staff and incarcerated individuals at will; 4 (i) the right to vocational, educational and rehabilitative programs 5 as well as re-entry programs and services; 6 (j) the right to individualized programs of treatment, including indi- 7 vidual mental health therapy and counseling, based on an individual's 8 needs, capacity and disposition; 9 (k) equitable remuneration for work and program assignments; and 10 (l) protection from cruel, inhumane and degrading treatment or punish- 11 ment by correctional staff. 12 2. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance 13 with this section. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 15 law.